District of Columbia statutes.
47-2705

Hours restricted for auctions of jewelry or valuables.

No person as herein provided for shall sell at public auction, from the first day of April until the 30th day of September, both inclusive, between the hours of 7:00 p.m. and 8:00 a.m., nor from the first day of October until the 30th day of March, both inclusive, between the hours of 6:00 p.m. and 8:00 a.m. any jewelry, diamond, or other precious stone, watch, gold and silver ware, gold and silver plated ware, statuary, porcelains, bric-a-brac, or articles of virtu.

Sept. 8, 1916, 39 Stat. 847, ch. 473, § 5
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-2705.
1973 Ed., § 47-2205.